Utah statutes.
17-50-318.   Mental health and substance abuse services.

Each county shall provide mental health and substance abuse services in accordance with Title 62A, Chapter 15, Substance Abuse and Mental Health Act.



Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

